Nebraska, session 109, LB81.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB81 LB81
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-6702, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6702 For purposes of the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act:
(1) Allowable growth percentage means the percentage increase, if
any, in the total assessed value of all real property in the state from
the prior year to the current year, as determined by the department;
(2) (1) Community college taxes means property taxes levied on real
property in this state by a community college area, excluding the
following:
(a) Any property taxes levied for bonded indebtedness;
(b) Any property taxes levied as a result of an override of limits
on property tax levies approved by voters pursuant to section 77-3444;
and
(c) Any property taxes that, as of the time of payment, were
delinquent for five years or more;
(3) (2) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(4) (3) Eligible taxpayer means any individual, corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, trust, estate, or other entity
that pays school district taxes or community college taxes during a
taxable year; and
(5) (4) School district taxes means property taxes levied on real
property in this state by a school district or multiple-district school
system, excluding the following:
(a) Any property taxes levied for bonded indebtedness;
(b) Any property taxes levied as a result of an override of limits
on property tax levies approved by voters pursuant to section 77-3444;
and
(c) Any property taxes that, as of the time of payment, were
delinquent for five years or more.
Sec. 2. Section 77-6703, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-2-

LB81 LB81
2025 2025
77-6703 (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2025 2024, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be allowed to each
eligible taxpayer a refundable credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or against the franchise tax imposed by
sections 77-3801 to 77-3807. The credit shall be equal to the credit
percentage for the taxable year, as set by the department under
subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the amount of school
district taxes paid by the eligible taxpayer during such taxable year.
(2)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin during
calendar year 2022, the department shall set the credit percentage so
that the total amount of credits for such taxable years shall be five
hundred forty-eight million dollars; and
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin during calendar
year 2023, the department shall set the credit percentage so that the
total amount of credits for such taxable years shall be five hundred
sixty million seven hundred thousand dollars; and .
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin during calendar
year 2024, the department shall set the credit percentage so that the
total amount of credits for such taxable years shall be the maximum
amount of credits allowed in the prior year increased by the allowable
growth percentage.
(3) If the school district taxes are paid by a corporation having an
election in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code, a
partnership, a limited liability company, a trust, or an estate, the
amount of school district taxes paid during the taxable year may be
allocated to the shareholders, partners, members, or beneficiaries in the
same proportion that income is distributed for taxable years beginning or
deemed to begin before January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended. The department shall provide forms and schedules
necessary for verifying eligibility for the credit provided in this
-3-

LB81 LB81
2025 2025
section and for allocating the school district taxes paid. For taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2021, and
before January 1, 2025 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, the refundable credit shall be claimed by the corporation having
an election in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code,
the partnership, the limited liability company, the trust, or the estate
that paid the school district taxes.
(4) For any fiscal year or short year taxpayer, the credit may be
claimed in the first taxable year that begins following the calendar year
for which the credit percentage was determined. The credit shall be taken
for the school district taxes paid by the taxpayer during the immediately
preceding calendar year.
(5) For the first taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, for a corporation having an election in
effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code, a partnership, a
limited liability company, a trust, or an estate that paid school
district taxes in calendar year 2020 but did not claim the credit
directly or allocate such school district taxes to the shareholders,
partners, members, or beneficiaries as permitted under subsection (3) of
this section, there shall be allowed an additional refundable credit.
This credit shall be equal to six percent, multiplied by the amount of
school district taxes paid during 2020 by the eligible taxpayer.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-6702 and 77-6703, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-